Alabama, session 2026rs, HB575.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 17-6-35 and 17-7-21, Code of
Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§17-6-35
If the elector desires to vote a straight party ticket,
that is, for each and every candidate for one party for
Page 1

that is, for each and every candidate for one party for
HB575 INTRODUCED
whatever office nominated, he or she shall mark the name of
the party at the head of the ticket in the manner determined
by a rule adopted by the Secretary of State under the
Administrative Procedure ActNo ballot may include any feature
that allows straight political party ticket voting by
electors."
"§17-7-21
(a) The governing body of any county or municipality or
other political subdivision of the state by adoption of an
appropriate resolution, may authorize, adopt, and direct the
use of electronic vote counting systems for use in all
elections held in such county or municipality or other
political subdivision or any portion thereof. The resolution,
a copy of which shall be filed with the Secretary of State,
shall specify the particular type of equipment to be used and
a procedure for implementation.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), no electronic vote
counting system shall be used unless it has been constructed
so that it does all of the following:
(1) Permits and requires voting in secrecy.
(2) Permits each elector to vote at any election for
all persons and offices for whom and for which he or she is
lawfully entitled to vote;, to vote for as many persons for an
office as he or she is entitled to vote for;, and to vote for
or against any question upon which he or she is entitled to
vote.
(3) Permits the voter at other than primary elections
to vote a straight political party ticket in one operation.
Page 2

to vote a straight political party ticket in one operation.
HB575 INTRODUCED
(4)(3) Permits the automatic tabulating equipment to be
set to reject all votes for any office or question when the
number of votes therefor exceeds the number that the voter is
entitled to cast or when the voter is not entitled to cast a
vote for the office or question.
(5)(4) Is capable of correctly counting votes.
(6)(5) When used in primary elections, counts only
votes for the candidates of one party, rejects all votes for
an office when the number of votes therefor exceeds the number
that the voter is entitled to cast, and rejects all votes of a
voter cast for candidates of more than one party.
(7)(6) At presidential elections, permits each elector,
by one operation, to vote for all presidential electors of a
party or independent candidates for president or vice
president.
(8)(7) Provides a method for write-in voting.
(9)(8) Is capable of accumulating a count of the
specific number of ballots tallied for a precinct;,
accumulating total votes by candidate for each office;, and
accumulating total votes for and against each question for the
precinct.
(10)(9) Is capable of tallying votes from ballots of
different political parties from the same precinct, in the
case of a primary election.
(11)(10) Is capable of automatically producing precinct
vote totals in printed, marked, or punched form, or a
combination thereof.
(12)(11) Is capable of accurately and correctly
Page 3

(12)(11) Is capable of accurately and correctly
HB575 INTRODUCED
tabulating each vote and having the same sothose votes
certified.
(13)(12) Is not capable of connecting to the Internet
or cell phone networks and does not possess modem technology."
Section 2. Sections 17-6-36, 17-6-37, 17-6-38, and
17-6-39, Code of Alabama 1975, relating to the procedure of
straight political party ticket voting, are repealed.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on January
1, 2027.
Page 4